Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.115

Chauffeur.

"Chauffeur" means a person authorized by the department under this title to drive a limousine, and, if operating in a port district that regulates limousines under RCW 46.72A.030(2), meets the licensing requirements of that port district.

[ 1996 c 87 s 1.]